Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.150

Credit for military service.

Every person who was a member of the fire department at the time he or she entered and served in the armed forces of the United States in time of war, whether as a draftee, or inductee, and who shall have been discharged from such armed forces under conditions other than dishonorable, shall have added and accredited to his or her period of employment as a firefighter his or her period of war or peacetime service in the armed forces: PROVIDED, That such added and accredited service shall not as to any individual exceed five years.

[ 2007 c 218 s 55; 1955 c 382 s 14.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.